Idaho statutes. Title 36 FISH AND GAME
Chapter 23
WILDLIFE VIOLATOR COMPACT

Sec.

§ 36-2301. Wildlife violator compact — Execution.

The governor of the state of Idaho is authorized to execute a compact on behalf of this state with any other state or states for the purpose of cooperating with those states for the promotion of interstate cooperation in connection with the enforcement of wildlife laws.

§ 36-2302. Form and content.

The form and content of the compact shall be substantially as provided in this section, and the effect of its provisions shall be interpreted and administered in conformity with the provisions of this section:

ARTICLE I

ARTICLE II

ARTICLE III

ARTICLE IV

ARTICLE V

ARTICLE VII

ARTICLE VIII

ARTICLE IX

ARTICLE X

§ 36-2303. Board of compact administrators — Member.

In furtherance of the provisions contained in the compact, there shall be one (1) member of the board from the state of Idaho who shall be the director or other officer of the Idaho department of fish and game charged with directing the enforcement activities of the department.